Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.360

Fees—Study and adjustment.

To ensure cost recovery for department of licensing services, the department of licensing shall submit a fee study to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2003, and on a biennial basis thereafter. Based on this fee study, the Washington state legislature will review and adjust fees accordingly.

[ 2002 c 352 s 27.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 352: See note following RCW 46.09.410.